Utah statutes.
35A-8-411.   Authorities may join or cooperate.

(1) Two or more authorities may cooperate with one another or jointly exercise any or all of their powers for the purpose of financing, issuing bonds and other obligations and giving security for them, planning, undertaking, owning, constructing, operating, or contracting with respect to a housing project or projects located within the area of operation of any one or more of the authorities.

(2)  For this purpose, an authority may by resolution authorize a housing authority joining or cooperating with the authority to act on the authority's behalf.

